Hawaii statutes.
§466J-8 Denial, revocation, or suspension
of license. (a) The board shall have the power to deny, revoke, or
suspend any license issued or applied for in accordance with this chapter, upon
proof that the person:

(1) Is guilty of fraud or deceit in procuring or
attempting to procure a license to practice as a radiographer or as a radiation
therapy technologist;

(2) Is mentally incompetent;

(3) Is guilty of unprofessional conduct; or

(4) Has knowingly or repeatedly violated this
chapter.

(b) Before denying, suspending, or revoking
any license pursuant to subsection (a), the board shall furnish the licensee a
notice in writing as prescribed by section 91-9 and shall afford the licensee
an opportunity to be heard in person and by or with counsel. Any order denying
a license, or suspending or revoking a license shall be rendered not later than
fifteen days after the hearing, and any aggrieved person may appeal the order
as provided in chapter 91.

(c) The board shall suspend, refuse to renew,
reinstate, or restore, or deny any license or application if the board has
received certification from the child support enforcement agency pursuant to
the terms of section 576D-13 that the licensee or applicant is not in
compliance with an order of support or has failed to comply with a subpoena or
warrant relating to a paternity or child support proceeding. Unless otherwise
provided by law, the board shall issue, renew, restore, or reinstate the
license only upon receipt of an authorization from the child support
enforcement agency, office of child support hearings, or family court.
Subsection (b) shall not apply to a license suspension pursuant to this
subsection.

(d) The board shall not
renew or reinstate, or shall deny or suspend, any license or application if the
board has received certification from an administering entity pursuant to
chapter 436C that the licensee or applicant either: is in default or breach of any obligation under any student loan,
student loan repayment contract, or scholarship contract that financed the
licensee's or applicant's education; or has failed to comply with a repayment
plan.

Upon receipt of a
certification pursuant to chapter 436C, the board, without further review or
hearing shall, as applicable:

(1) Suspend the license;

(2) Deny the application or request for renewal of
the license; or

(3) Deny the request for reinstatement of the license.

Unless otherwise provided by law, the
board shall renew, reinstate, or grant the license only upon receipt of an
authorization from the administering entity. [L 1974, c 253, pt of §2;
am L 1980, c 128, pt of §1; am L 1990, c 273, §10; am L 1997, c 293, §20; am L
2002, c 226, §8; am L 2003, c 133, §12; am L 2014, c 9, §8]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next